Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 2 School Committees and Superintendents [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-2-21.
Pre-budget consultation — Annual reports — Appropriation requests — Budgets.

At least sixty (60) days, but not more than ninety (90) days, prior to the formal submission of the school budget to the appropriate city or town officials by the school committee, there shall be a joint, pre-budget meeting between the school committee and the city or town council(s). At or before this meeting:

The highest elected official of the city or town shall submit to the school committee an estimate, prepared in a manner approved by the department of administration, of projected revenues for the next fiscal year. In the case of the property tax, the projections shall include only changes in the property tax base, not property tax rates;

The school committee shall submit to the city or town council a statement for the next ensuing fiscal year of anticipated total expenditures, projected enrollments with resultant staff and facility requirements, estimated enrollment and payments to charter schools, and any necessary or mandated changes in school programs or operations; and

The school committee shall prepare and submit, annually, to the department of elementary and secondary education, on or before the first day of August, a report in the manner and form prescribed by the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education; the committee shall also prepare, not less than thirty (30) days before the date of the annual financial town meeting, or the date of the meeting of the city council at which annual appropriations are made, on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of elementary and secondary education, the estimates and recommendations of the amounts necessary to be appropriated for the support of public schools, including a distinct line item for estimated payments to charter schools for the fiscal year ensuing; provided, that a copy of these estimates and recommendations shall be sent to the department of elementary and secondary education, and until the report is made, and if the estimates and recommendations are not presented to the department, it may refuse to draw its orders for the money in the state treasury apportioned to the city or town; provided, that the necessary blank for the report has been furnished by the department on or before the first day of June, next preceding, and the necessary forms for the estimates and recommendations shall have been furnished by the department not less than sixty (60) days before the date of the annual appropriations meeting of the city council. The committee shall also prepare and submit annually to the department of elementary and secondary education and at the annual financial town meeting, a report to the city or town, setting forth its doings, the state, and condition of the schools, and plans for their improvement, which report, unless printed, shall be read in open meeting; and if printed, at least three (3) copies shall be transmitted to the department on or before the day of the annual financial town meeting in each year.

If the amount appropriated by the town meeting, the city or town council, or budget referendum is either more or less than the amount recommended and requested by the school committee, the school committee shall, within thirty (30) days after the appropriation is made, amend its estimates and recommendations so that expenses are no greater than the total of all revenue appropriated by the state or town or provided for public schools under the care, control, and management of the school committee.

Only a school budget in which total expenses are less than, or equal to, appropriations and revenues shall be considered an adopted school budget.

Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary:

The budget adopted and presented by any school committee for the fiscal year 2008 shall not propose the appropriation of municipal funds (exclusive of state and federal aid) in excess of one hundred five and one-quarter percent (105.25%) of the total of municipal funds appropriated by the city or town council for school purposes for fiscal year 2007;

The budget adopted and presented by any school committee for the fiscal year 2009 shall not propose the appropriation of municipal funds (exclusive of state and federal aid) in excess of one hundred five percent (105%) of the total of municipal funds appropriated by the city or town council for school purposes for fiscal year 2008;

The budget adopted and presented by any school committee for the fiscal year 2010 shall not propose the appropriation of municipal funds (exclusive of state and federal aid) in excess of one hundred four and three-quarters percent (104.75%) of the total of municipal funds appropriated by the city or town council for school purposes for fiscal year 2009;

The budget adopted and presented by any school committee for the fiscal year 2011 shall not propose the appropriation of municipal funds (exclusive of state and federal aid) in excess of one hundred four and one-half percent (104.5%) of the total of municipal funds appropriated by the city or town council for school purposes for fiscal year 2010;

The budget adopted and presented by any school committee for the fiscal year 2012 shall not propose the appropriation of municipal funds (exclusive of state and federal aid) in excess of one hundred four and one-quarter percent (104.25%) of the total of municipal funds appropriated by the city or town council for school purposes for fiscal year 2011; and

The budget adopted and presented by any school committee for the fiscal year 2013 and for each fiscal year thereafter shall not propose the appropriation of municipal funds (exclusive of state and federal aid) in excess of one hundred four percent (104%) of the total of municipal funds appropriated by the city or town council for school purposes for the previous fiscal year.

Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, any judgment rendered pursuant to §

16-2-21.4(b)

shall consider the percentage caps on school district budgets set forth in subsection (d) of this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1869, ch. 60, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 10; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 23; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-21

; P.L. 1980, ch. 152, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 182, §§ 12, 13; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 253, § 5; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 489, § 1.

16-2-21.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 182, § 13; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

16-2-21.2.
Three-year budget forecasting process.

On or before November 1 of each year, the highest elected official of each town or city shall submit to the school committee an estimate, prepared in a manner approved by the department of administration, of projected revenues for the next three (3) fiscal years. In the case of the property tax, the projection shall include only changes in the property tax base, not property tax rates.

On or before November 1, the school committee shall submit to the city or town council an estimate of its expenditures by major program and school revenues for the three (3) years, which designates those expenditures, in whole or in part, that are required by state law or regulation.

The state shall cooperate by the preparation and provision of information necessary to develop these three (3) year forecasts. The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide estimates of school aid based on current law or based on experience in previous years as determined by the commissioner. The department of elementary and secondary education shall also prepare a three (3) year plan to show the impact of state aid and state educational programs on each school district. All state aid estimates and three (3) year plans prepared by the department of elementary and secondary education shall be submitted to the director of the department of administration for review and comment prior to distribution among school districts. The department of administration shall develop a methodology for the calculation of three (3) year revenue forecasts by cities and towns. At the request of any city or town, the department of administration shall assist the city or town in making a forecast of revenues. In the absence of a request, the department of administration shall certify that any forecasts made by a city or town are consistent with the department of administration’s methodology. The retirement board established pursuant to §

36-8-3

shall provide projected rates for contribution to the teacher and municipal retirement systems. The state budget officer shall supply the assumptions he or she is using regarding the performance of the economy of the state.

There shall annually be a joint meeting between the city or town council and the school committee not later than December 31st to review the revenue and expenditure projections and to discuss issues affecting the preparation of the school budget.

For school districts that are not on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year, the department of elementary and secondary education may, upon request of the district, establish other time periods for this planning process.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 182, § 13; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 71; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 10, § 1.

16-2-21.3.
Meetings with city and town councils.

For the purposes of §§

16-2-21

and

16-2-21

.2, the term “town or city council” means the town or city council or other elected body charged by either local charter or public law with either preparing the budget for submission to town meeting or for final adoption of the budget. Meetings between the town or city council, as defined, and the school committee shall be held under the provision of law governing the meetings of the council. The school committee of a regional school district shall meet independently with the council of each town or city within the regional school district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 13, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 71.

16-2-21.4.
School budgets — Compliance with certain requirements.

Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, whenever a city, town, or regional school committee determines that its budget is insufficient to comply with the provisions of §

16-2-21

,

16-7-23

, or

16-7-24

, the city, town, or regional school committee shall adhere to the appropriated budget or the provisions of §

16-2-23

in the absence of an appropriated budget. The chairperson of the city, town, or regional school committee, in accordance with the provisions of §

16-2-9

, shall be required to petition the commissioner, in writing, to seek alternatives for the district to comply with state regulations and/or provide waivers to state regulations and, in particular, those which are more restrictive than federal regulations that allow the school committee to operate with a balanced budget. Waivers which affect the health and safety of students and staff or which violate the provisions of chapter 24 of this title shall not be granted. The commissioner must consider alternatives for districts to comply with regulations and/or provide waivers to regulations in order that the school committee may operate with a balanced budget within the previously authorized appropriation. In the petition to the commissioner, the school committee shall be required to identify the alternatives to meet regulations and/or identify the waivers it seeks in order to provide the commissioner with the revised budget which allows it to have a balanced budget within the previously authorized appropriation. The commissioner shall respond within fifteen (15) calendar days from the date of the written petition from the school committee. If the commissioner does not approve of the alternatives to meet regulations or the waivers from regulations which are sought by the school committee, or if the commissioner does not approve of the modified expenditure plan submitted by the school committee, then: (1) within ten (10) days of receiving the commissioner’s response, the school committee may submit a written request to the city or town council for the council of the municipality to decide whether to increase the appropriation for schools to meet expenditures. The decision to increase any appropriations shall be conducted pursuant to the local charter or the public law controlling the approval of appropriations within the municipality; or (2) in a regional school district, the chairperson of the school committee may, within ten (10) days of receiving the commissioner’s response, submit a written request to the chief elected official of each of the municipalities to request that the city or town council in each of their respective towns meet to decide whether or not to increase the appropriation for schools to meet expenditures. The decision to increase any appropriations shall be conducted pursuant to the local charter or the public law controlling the approval of appropriations within the municipality.

In the event of a negative vote by the appropriating authority, the school committee shall have the right to seek additional appropriations by bringing an action in the superior court for the county of Providence and shall be required to demonstrate that the school committee lacks the ability to adequately run the schools for that school year with a balanced budget within the previously authorized appropriation or in accordance with §§

16-2-21

,

16-2-23

,

16-7-23

, and

16-7-24

. In no event shall any court order obtained by the school committee have force and effect for any period longer than the fiscal year for which the litigation is brought. Any action filed pursuant to this section shall be set down for a hearing at the earliest possible time and shall be given precedence over all matters except older matters of the same character. The court shall render its decision within thirty (30) days of the close of the hearings. Upon the bringing of an action in the superior court by the school committee to increase appropriations, the chief executive officer of the municipality, or in the case of a regional school district the chief elected officials from each of the member municipalities, shall cause to have a financial and performance audit in compliance with the generally acceptable governmental auditing standards of the school department conducted by the auditor general, the bureau of audits, or a certified public accounting firm qualified in performance audits. The results of the audit shall be made public upon completion and paid for by the school committee to the state or private certified public accounting firm.

The auditor general shall select the auditor if the audit is not directly performed by his or her office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 244, § 1.

16-2-21.5.
Notification of state school aid to school districts.

Any requirement that the department of elementary and secondary education notify the local school districts of state education aid estimates prior to the submission of the governor’s budget presentation is suspended until further action by the general assembly. The department shall provide state education aid estimates based upon the governor’s budget submission and shall supplement these estimates upon the passage of the budget by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 22, § 1.

16-2-21.6.
Collective bargaining fiscal impact statements.

Prior to executing any collective bargaining agreement between a school committee and representatives of teachers and/or other school employees, the school committee in any municipality, or regional school district with an elected school committee, or the chief executive officer in any municipality with an appointed school committee shall prepare or cause to be prepared a collective bargaining fiscal impact statement. These statements shall set forth, in dollar amounts, estimates of the fiscal impact, during the term of the proposed agreement. No comment or opinion relative to the merits of the terms of the contract shall be included, except that technical or mechanical errors or defects may be noted.

The fiscal impact statement and the awarded contract shall be publicized and shall be made immediately available upon ratification of the contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 36, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 265, § 2.

16-2-22.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 60, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-22

; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 12, effective August 9, 1996.

16-2-23.
Expenditures pending annual appropriation.

The school committee, in the interval between the close of the city or town fiscal year and the making of the annual appropriations for the support of public schools, may expend for public school purposes the unexpended balance remaining in the treasury from the school appropriation of the expired fiscal year, and for each month a sum of money not exceeding one-twelfth (1/12) of the amount appropriated in the preceding year for the support of public schools, and the city or town treasurer shall pay orders drawn by the school committee in accordance with the provisions of this section from any money in the city or town treasury not otherwise appropriated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 17; P.L. 1919, ch. 1804, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-23

.

16-2-24.
Survey of city or town schools.

The state board of regents for elementary and secondary education may make or cause to be made a survey of the public schools of any city or town, and shall make the survey upon the request of the school committee of any city or town; provided, that the school committee shall share one-half (1/2) the cost of any survey that it requests and the state department of elementary and secondary education shall also share half of the cost. The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall include in its annual report to the general assembly a summary of its findings upon the surveys with the recommendations as shall seem advisable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 63, § 21; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 65, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 176, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-24

; P.L. 1962, ch. 35, § 1.

16-2-25.
Distribution of powers in Providence and Cranston.

In the cities of Providence and Cranston the school committee of each city shall employ the superintendent and teachers, have charge and custody of all school buildings and school property, manage and regulate the schools, and draw all orders for the payment of their expenses from the money appropriated by the city council for the support of public schools; provided, that the city council of each city shall have the expenditure of all sums appropriated for the purchase of land for school purposes or for the improvement of the land or for the construction or repair of school buildings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 420, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 6; P.L. 1915, ch. 1192, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-25

.

16-2-26.
Special statutes prevailing.

Except as provided in this section, the provisions of this chapter are subject to the provisions of any special statutes respecting any particular city or town, none of which are repealed by this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-26

.

16-2-27.
Eligibility for attendance — Kindergarten.

Every child who has attained, or will have attained, five (5) years of age on or before September 1 of any school year shall be eligible to attend kindergarten during all the days that the kindergartens are in session during the school year. If a child is enrolled in kindergarten, the attendance requirements of §

16-19-1

shall apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 71; P.L. 2002, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 467, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 471, § 1.

16-2-28.
Eligibility for attendance — First grade.

Every child who has completed or will have completed six (6) years of life on or before September 1 of any school year shall be eligible to attend first grade during all the days that the public schools are in session during the school year. Every child shall be eligible to attend first grade only upon completion of a state recognized or accredited kindergarten program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 71; P.L. 1988, ch. 642, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 393, § 1.

16-2-28.1.
Regulations.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate regulations, including criteria for eligibility for waiver, pertaining to §

16-2-28

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 642, § 2.

16-2-28.2.
Kindergarten multiple sessions.

All public and private schools that provide multiple kindergarten sessions shall make every effort to give written notice to parents, thirty (30) days before the start of the school year, which kindergarten session their child has been placed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 188, § 1.

16-2-29.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 113, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 330, § 1.

16-2-30.
School lunch programs.

All municipal school systems in this state shall make available, in their school lunch programs, low fat fortified milk with a milk fat content of one percent (1%) or less.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 219, § 1.

16-2-31.
School crossing guard equipment.

All municipal school systems in this state shall provide flags, belts, apparel, and devices to children acting in the capacity of school crossing guards, and this equipment shall be made from retro-reflective and/or fluorescent materials visible both day and night at three hundred feet (300´) to approaching motorists using lawful low beam headlights.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 68, § 1.

16-2-32.
Policy manual for school committee.

All school committees in the state will have a policy manual. The policy manual will have all school committee policies in writing, properly indexed, and kept up to date. The policy manuals will be a source used to govern each school system. At least one policy manual will be available to the faculty and staff in each school library. At least one policy manual will be available for public reference at each administrative building and public library.

There is appropriated the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), from money not otherwise appropriated, to the department of elementary and secondary education to implement a school committee/administrator training program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 642, § 1.

16-2-33.
City of Woonsocket — Compensation to school committee members.

The city council of the city of Woonsocket shall appropriate a sum certain and annually determine salaries for the chairperson and members of the school committee for the city of Woonsocket.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 503, § 1.

16-2-33.1.
City of Woonsocket — School dress code.

The Woonsocket school committee, in conjunction with the superintendent, may adopt a school dress code for Woonsocket elementary, middle and high school students; provided, that:

the principal, staff and parents have had an opportunity to offer suggestions and comments;

the dress code shall be adopted at a time determined by the school committee, and the school committee shall give notice to the parents three (3) months before a dress code is required; and

that on days when a nationally recognized youth organization has a scheduled function students participating in this organization shall be exempt from the dress code on that day.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 179, § 1.

16-2-33.2.
City of Central Falls — School dress code.

The Central Falls school district governing board, in conjunction with the superintendent, may adopt a school dress code for Central Falls primary, elementary, junior, and senior high school students; provided that:

The principal, staff, and parents have had an opportunity to offer suggestions and comments;

The dress code shall be adopted at a time determined by the governing board, and the governing board shall give notice to the parents three (3) months before a dress code is required; and

That on days when a nationally recognized youth organization has a scheduled function, students participating in this organization shall be exempt from the dress code on that day.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 277, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 343, § 1.

16-2-34.
Central Falls School District board of trustees.

There is hereby established a seven (7) member board of trustees, which shall govern the Central Falls School District. With the exception of those powers and duties reserved by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, the board of trustees shall have the powers and duties of school committees. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, as the executive agent of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, is authorized to exercise in whole or in part care, control, and management over the public schools of the Central Falls school district within the scope of authority of the board of trustees and board of regents, whenever the commissioner deems such intervention to be necessary and appropriate.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall appoint the members of the board of trustees from nominations made by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The chairperson shall also be selected in this manner. The board of regents shall determine the number, qualifications, and terms of office of members of the board of trustees, provided however, that at least four (4) of the members shall be residents of the city and parents of current or former Central Falls public school students. The remaining three (3) shall be appointed at large.

The board of regents shall provide parameters for overall budget requests, approve the budget, and otherwise participate in budget development.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall recommend parameters for overall budget requests, recommend a budget, and otherwise participate in budget development.

The commissioner shall approve the process for selection of the superintendent.

The board of trustees shall meet monthly and serve without compensation. The board of trustees shall have broad policy making authority for the operation of the school, as well as the following powers and duties:

To identify the educational needs of the district;

To develop educational policies to meet the needs of students in the school district;

To appoint a superintendent to serve as its chief executive officer and to approve assistant and associate superintendents from nominations made by the superintendent;

To provide policy guidance and otherwise participate in budget development; and

To develop staffing policies which ensure that all students are taught by educators of the highest possible quality.

The superintendent shall serve at the pleasure of the board of trustees with the initial appointment to be for a period of not more than three (3) years; provided, however, that the terms and conditions of employment are subject to the approval of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

It shall be the responsibility of the superintendent to manage and operate the school on a day-to-day basis. The superintendent’s duties shall include the following:

To be responsible for the care, supervision, and management of the schools;

To recommend to the board of trustees educational policies to meet the needs of the district, and to implement policies established by the board of trustees;

To present nominations to the board of trustees for assistant and associate superintendents and to appoint all other school personnel;

To provide for the evaluation of all school district personnel;

To establish a school based management approach for decision making for the operation of the school;

To prepare a budget and otherwise participate in budget development as required, and to authorize purchases consistent with the adopted school district budget;

To report to the board of trustees, on a regular basis, the financial condition and operation of the schools, and to report annually on the educational progress of the schools;

To establish appropriate advisory committees as needed to provide guidance on new directions and feedback on the operation of the schools;

With policy guidance from the board of trustees and extensive involvement of the administrators and faculty in the school, to annually prepare a budget. The board of trustees shall approve the budget and transmit it to the commissioner. The board of regents for elementary and secondary education, upon recommendation of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, shall provide parameters for the overall budget request. Based on review and recommendation by the commissioner, the board of regents shall approve the total budget and incorporate it into its budget request to the governor and to the general assembly. Line item budgeting decisions shall be the responsibility of the superintendent; and

To negotiate, along with the chairperson of the board of trustees and his or her appointed designee, all district employment contracts, which contracts shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education with the concurrence of the board of regents.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or otherwise interfere with the rights of teachers and other school employees to bargain collectively pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28, to exercise rights afforded under any statute including, but not limited to, Title 16, or to allow the commissioner, board of trustees or the superintendent to abrogate any agreement by collective bargaining.

The appointment of the special state administrator for the Central Falls School District and the Central Falls School District Advisory Group, created by chapter 312 of the Rhode Island Public Laws of 1991, will no longer be in effect upon the selection and appointment of the board of trustees created in this section. All powers and duties of the special state administrator and the Central Falls School District Advisory Group are hereby transferred and assigned to the board of trustees created in this section, upon the selection and appointment of that board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 1.

16-2-35.
The Middletown public schools sponsorship program.

The school committee of the town of Middletown shall be authorized to adopt by resolution the Middletown public schools sponsorship program (the “program”). The purpose of said program shall be to provide funding to aid the Middletown school district in maintaining its current extra-curricular program offerings by creating paid advertising and sponsorship opportunities through the Middletown public schools.

Such program shall meet the following guidelines and criteria:

Proposals for sponsorships shall be reviewed by the superintendent of schools, and if approved by the superintendent, such approval shall be submitted to the Middletown school committee for final approval;

Paid advertising and business sponsorships shall be permitted on school district grounds only with the prior approval of both the superintendent and the school committee of the town of Middletown.

The Middletown school committee shall promulgate a policy on advertising and business sponsorship. Any advertising on school property, in district publications, and distribution or display that is paid for by a private, business, or commercial sponsor shall be consistent with the provisions of such policy. In promulgating such policy, the school district shall be especially cognizant of the requirements of chapter 21 of this title in regard to health and safety of pupils.

Advertising and business sponsorships shall be limited to products, services, and issues that support and promote a positive educational atmosphere.

Approved advertising, signage, and other promotions shall be in good taste, use good production quality, and shall not detract from the educational environment.

Prohibited advertising and business sponsorships shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Anything that is illegal, obscene, profane, vulgar, prurient, defamatory, violent, abusive, impolite, or that contains sexual content, sexual imagery, or sexual overtones, or that is otherwise not suitable for minors;

Anything that is discriminatory or promotes goods or services not suitable for use or consumption by minors;

Materials in support of or promoting a specific religion or religious viewpoint; and

Materials in support of or promoting a specific political candidate or viewpoint.

The provisions of the section shall not apply to information, promotions, or announcements issued by the town of Middletown and/or the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 270, § 1.

16-2-36.
Orientation.

All public schools shall, prior to September 1 of each year, make every effort to provide written notice to parents, guardians, or caretakers of students inviting those parents, guardians, or caretakers to attend orientation at the school within thirty (30) days from the start of the school year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 280, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 281, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.